Utah statutes.
78B-2-217.   Adverse possession -- Possession of tenant considered possession of landlord.

When a landlord and tenant relationship exists between persons, the possession of the tenant is considered the possession of the landlord until the expiration of seven years after the termination of the tenancy, or, if there has been no written lease, until seven years from the time of the last payment of rent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

